Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.9925, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Distribution. Notwithstanding section 297A.94, proceeds of the metropolitan sales tax are distributed: (1) 25 percent to the state rent assistance account under section 462A.2095;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) 25 percent to the metropolitan city aid account in the housing assistance fund under section 477A.37; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) 50deleted text end new text begin (2) 75new text end percent to the metropolitan county aid account in the housing assistance fund under section 477A.37. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.37, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Metropolitan city aid account; appropriation. (a) A metropolitan city aid account is established in the housing assistance fund. The account consists of deleted text begin money as provided under section 297A.9925, and any otherdeleted text end money donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. (b) Money in the metropolitan city aid account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of revenue for payments to cities as provided under section 477A.35.